Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.090

Amount garnishee required to hold.

(1) The writ of garnishment shall set forth in the first paragraph the amount that garnishee is required to hold, which shall be an amount determined as follows: (a)(i) If after judgment, the amount of the judgment remaining unsatisfied on the clerk of the court's execution docket, if any, plus interest to the date of garnishment, as provided in RCW 4.56.110, plus estimated interest that may accrue during the garnishment process on a per diem basis under subsection (3) of this section plus taxable costs and attorneys' fees, or (ii) if before judgment, the amount prayed for in the complaint plus estimated taxable costs of suit and attorneys' fees, together with, (b) whether before or after judgment, estimated costs of garnishment as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The court may, by order, set a higher amount to be held upon a showing of good cause by plaintiff.

(2) Costs recoverable in garnishment proceedings, to be estimated for purposes of subsection (1) of this section, include filing and ex parte fees, service and affidavit fees, postage and costs of certified mail, answer fee or fees, other fees legally chargeable to a plaintiff in the garnishment process, and a garnishment attorney fee in the amount of the greater of one hundred dollars or ten percent of (a) the amount of the judgment remaining unsatisfied or (b) the amount prayed for in the complaint. The garnishment attorney fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars.

(3) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the plaintiff must indicate in the writ a specific dollar amount of estimated interest that may accrue during the garnishment process per day. The amount must be based on an interest rate of twelve percent or the interest rate set forth in the judgment, whichever rate is less.

[ 2012 c 159 s 2; 2000 c 72 s 2; 1988 c 231 s 24; 1987 c 442 s 1009; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 9. Formerly RCW 7.33.090.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.